Connecticut, session 2026, SB00337.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) There is established a task force
to study the system of removal and storage of the property of evicted
tenants under section 47a-42 of the general statutes. Such study shall
include, but need not be limited to, an examination of the cost of
removal of items to municipalities, the average value of items stored
pursuant to said section and any recommendations for statutory or
regulatory changes to (1) reduce the cost burden of the property removal
process on plaintiffs, defendants and municipalities, and (2) improve
the efficiency of such process.
(b) The task force shall consist of the following members:
(1) Two appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives,
one of whom represents a municipality and one of whom is a state
marshal;
(2) Two appointed by the president pro tempore of the Senate;
(3) One appointed by the minority leader of the House of
Representatives; and
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 337
(4) One appointed by the minority leader of the Senate.
(c) Any member of the task force appointed under subdivision (1),
(2), (3) or (4) of subsection (b) of this section may be a member of the
General Assembly.
(d) All initial appointments to the task force shall be made not later
than thirty days after the effective date of this section. Any vacancy shall
be filled by the appointing authority.
(e) The speaker of the House of Representatives and the president pro
tempore of the Senate shall select the chairpersons of the task force from
among the members of the task force. Such chairpersons shall schedule
the first meeting of the task force, which shall be held not later than sixty
days after the effective date of this section.
(f) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to housing
shall serve as administrative staff of the task force.
(g) Not later than January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report
on its findings and recommendations to the joint standing committee of
the General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to housing,
in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
The task force shall terminate on the date that it submits such report or
January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
HSG Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2